src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-I-kinakiyi_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - kinakiyi - ok : # -m inanimate noun, liver AEW NA1
     kinakini+NI+Sg: kinakini
     kinakini+NI+Pl: kinakiistsi
     kinakini+NI+Non: kinakii

     kinakini+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: [ nohkinakini, nohkinakiimi ]
     kinakini+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: [ nohkinakiistsi, nohkinakiimistsi ]
     kinakini+NI+Px1Sg+Non: [ nohkinakii, nohkinakiimi ]

     kinakini+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: [ nohkinakinnaani, nohkinakiiminnaani ]
     kinakini+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: [ nohkinakinnaanistsi, nohkinakiiminnaanistsi ]
     kinakini+NI+Px1Pl+Non: [ nohkinakinnaani, nohkinakiiminnaani ]

     kinakini+NI+Px21Pl+Sg: [ kohkinakinnooni, kohkinakiiminnooni ]
     kinakini+NI+Px21Pl+Pl: [ kohkinakinnoonistsi, kohkinakiiminnoonistsi ]
     kinakini+NI+Px21Pl+Non: [ kohkinakinnooni, kohkinakiiminnooni ]

     kinakini+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: [ kohkinakini, kohkinakiimi ]
     kinakini+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: [ kohkinakiistsi, kohkinakiimistsi ]
     kinakini+NI+Px2Sg+Non: [ kohkinakii, kohkinakiimi ]

     kinakini+NI+Px2Pl+Sg: [ kohkinakiwaawayi, kohkinakiimoaawayi ]
     kinakini+NI+Px2Pl+Pl: [ kohkinakiwaawaistsi, kohkinakiimoaawaistsi ]
     kinakini+NI+Px2Pl+Non: [ kohkinakiwaawai, kohkinakiimoaawai ]

     kinakini+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: [ ohkinakini, ohkinakiimi ]
     kinakini+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: [ ohkinakiistsi, ohkinakiimistsi ]
     kinakini+NI+Px3Sg+Non: [ ohkinakii, ohkinakiimi ]

     kinakini+NI+Px3Pl+Sg: [ ohkinakiwaawayi, ohkinakiimoaawayi ]
     kinakini+NI+Px3Pl+Pl: [ ohkinakiwaawaistsi, ohkinakiimoaawaistsi ]
     kinakini+NI+Px3Pl+Non: [ ohkinakiwaawai, ohkinakiimoaawai ]
